Washington statutes.
RCW 27.54.020

Powers and duties. (Expires June 30, 2027.)

(1) The semiquincentennial committee shall coordinate and provide guidance for Washington's official observance of the 250th anniversary of the founding of the United States, as marked by the Declaration of Independence in 1776.

(2) The committee may:

(a) Cooperate with national, regional, statewide, and local entities promoting the semiquincentennial;

(b) Assist, plan, or conduct semiquincentennial events;

(c) Support, plan, or produce educational resources and programs related to the semiquincentennial;

(d) Engage in or encourage fund-raising activities including revenue-generating enterprises, as well as the solicitation of charitable gifts, grants, or donations;

(e) Coordinate interagency participation in the observance;

(f) Create subcommittees comprised of committee members, honorary members, and community members to further the goals of the committee; and

(g) Perform other related duties.

[ 2022 c 97 s 2.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2022 c 97: See note following RCW 27.54.010.